New York, session 2025-2026, A5991.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Behavioral health website. 1. The office of mental health, 2 in conjunction with the office of addiction services and supports and 3 the department of education shall create and maintain a website which 4 shall provide information on behavioral health issues. Such issues shall 5 include, but shall not be limited to, depression, eating disorders, 6 anxiety, schizophrenia, post-traumatic stress disorder and bipolar 7 disorder. 8 2. Such behavioral health information, as required by subdivision one 9 of this section shall include, but shall not be limited to, signs and 10 symptoms of the behavioral health issues and coping mechanisms to assist 11 individuals dealing with such behavioral health issues. 12 3. The behavioral health website shall maintain a resource guide list- 13 ing contact information of local behavioral health resources and shall 14 be organized by county. Such contact information shall include the name, 15 address, telephone number, e-mail address and website, if any, of the 16 behavioral health resources. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 18 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03314-01-5